Oklahoma, session 2025, SB596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 24A.8, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 12, O.S.L. 2022 (51 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 24A.8), is amended to read as follows:


Section 24A.8. A. Law enforcement agencies shall make


available for public inspection and copying, if kept, the following


records:


1. An arrestee description, including the name, date of birth,


address, race, sex, physical description, and occupation of the


arrestee;



Req. No. 346 Page 1


2. Facts concerning the arrest, including the cause of arrest


and the name of the arresting officer;


3. A chronological list of all incidents, including initial


offense report information showing the offense, date, time, general


location, officer, and a brief summary of what occurred;


4. Radio logs, including a chronological listing of the calls


dispatched;


5. Conviction information, including the name of any person


convicted of a criminal offense;


6. Disposition of all warrants, including orders signed by a


judge of any court commanding a law enforcement officer to arrest a


particular person;


7. A crime summary, including an agency summary of crimes


reported and public calls for service by classification or nature


and number;


8. Jail registers, including jail blotter data or jail booking


information recorded on persons at the time of incarceration showing


the name of each prisoner with the date and cause of commitment, the


authority committing the prisoner, whether committed for a criminal


offense, a description of the prisoner, and the date or manner of


discharge or escape of the prisoner;


9. Annual reports submitted pursuant to subsection T of Section


2-506 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 346 Page 2


10. Audio and video recordings from recording equipment


attached to law enforcement vehicles or associated audio recordings


from recording equipment on the person of a law enforcement officer;


provided, the law enforcement agency may, before releasing any audio


or video recording provided for in this paragraph, redact or obscure


specific portions of the recording which:


a. depict the death of a person or a dead body, unless


the death was effected by a law enforcement officer,


b. depict nudity,


c. would identify minors under the age of sixteen (16)


years or would undermine any requirement to keep


certain juvenile records confidential as provided for


in Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,


d. depict acts of severe violence resulting in great


bodily injury, as defined in Section 11-904 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, against persons that are


clearly visible, unless the act of severe violence was


effected by a law enforcement officer,


e. depict great bodily injury, as defined in Section 11-


904 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, unless the


great bodily injury was effected by a law enforcement


officer,


f. include personal medical information that is not


already public,

Req. No. 346 Page 3


g. would undermine the assertion of a privilege provided


in Section 1-109 or Section 3-428 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes for detention or transportation for


mental health evaluation or treatment or drug or


alcohol detoxification purposes,


h. include personal information other than the name or


license plate number of a person not arrested, cited,


charged or issued a written warning. Such personal


information shall include any government-issued


identification number, date of birth, address or


financial information, or


i. reveal the identity of law enforcement officers who


have become subject to internal investigation by the


law enforcement agency as a result of an event


depicted in the recording. The option to protect the


identity of a law enforcement officer shall not be


available to the law enforcement agency after the law


enforcement agency has concluded the investigation and


rendered a decision as to final disciplinary action.


At such time when an investigation has concluded and


the law enforcement agency has rendered its decision


as to final disciplinary action, the portions of the


recordings previously withheld as provided for in this


subparagraph shall be available for public inspection

Req. No. 346 Page 4


and copying. The audio and video recordings withheld


as provided for in this subparagraph shall be


available for public inspection and copying before the


conclusion of the investigation if the investigation


lasts for an unreasonable amount of time; and


10. 11. a. Audio and video recordings from recording


equipment attached to the person of a law enforcement


officer that depict:


(1) the use of any physical force or violence by a


law enforcement officer,


(2) pursuits of any kind,


(3) traffic stops,


(4) any person being arrested, cited, charged or


issued a written warning,


(5) events that directly led to any person being


arrested, cited, charged or receiving a written


warning,


(6) detentions of any length for the purpose of


investigation,


(7) any exercise of authority by a law enforcement


officer that deprives a citizen of his or her


liberty,





Req. No. 346 Page 5


(8) actions by a law enforcement officer that have


become the cause of an investigation or charges


being filed,


(9) recordings in the public interest that may


materially aid a determination of whether law


enforcement officers are appropriately performing


their duties as public servants, or


(10) any contextual events occurring before or after


the events depicted in divisions (1) through (9)


of this subparagraph.


b. Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph a of


this paragraph, the law enforcement agency may, before


releasing any audio or video recording provided for in


this paragraph, redact or obscure specific portions of


the recording that:


(1) depict the death of a person or a dead body,


unless the death was effected by a law


enforcement officer,


(2) depict nudity,


(3) would identify minors under the age of sixteen


(16) years or would undermine any requirement to


keep certain juvenile records confidential as


provided for in Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes,

Req. No. 346 Page 6


(4) depict acts of severe violence resulting in great


bodily injury, as defined in Section 11-904 of


Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, against


persons that are clearly visible, unless the act


of severe violence was effected by a law


enforcement officer,


(5) depict great bodily injury, as defined in Section


11-904 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


unless the great bodily injury was effected by a


law enforcement officer,


(6) include personal medical information that is not


already public,


(7) undermine the assertion of a privilege as


provided in Section 1-109 or Section 3-428 of


Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes for detention


or transportation for mental health evaluation or


treatment or drug or alcohol detoxification


purposes,


(8) identify alleged victims of sex crimes or


domestic violence,


(9) identify any person who provides information to


law enforcement or the information provided by


that person when that person requests anonymity


or where disclosure of the identity of the person

Req. No. 346 Page 7


or the information provided could reasonably be


expected to threaten or endanger the physical


safety or property of the person or the physical


safety or property of others,


(10) undermine the assertion of a privilege to keep


the identity of an informer confidential as


provided for in Section 2510 of Title 12 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


(11) include personal information other than the name


or license plate number of a person not


officially arrested, cited, charged or issued a


written warning. Such personal information shall


include any government-issued identification


number, date of birth, address or financial


information,


(12) include information that would materially


compromise an ongoing criminal investigation or


ongoing criminal prosecution, provided that:


(a) ten (10) days following the formal


arraignment or initial appearance, whichever


occurs first, of a person charged in the


case in question, the recording shall be


made available for public inspection and


copying with no redaction of the portions

Req. No. 346 Page 8


that were temporarily withheld by reliance


on this division. Provided, before


potential release of a recording as provided


for in this subdivision, the prosecutor or


legal representative of the person charged


may request from the appropriate district


court an extension of time during which the


recording may be withheld under the


provisions of this division. When a request


for an extension of time has been filed with


the court, the recording in question may be


withheld until the court has issued a


ruling. Such requests for an extension of


the time during which the recording may be


withheld may be made on the grounds that


release of the recording will materially


compromise an ongoing criminal investigation


or criminal prosecution or on the grounds


that release of the recording will


materially compromise the right of an


accused to a fair trial that has yet to


begin. Courts considering such requests


shall conduct a hearing and consider whether


the interests of the public outweigh the

Req. No. 346 Page 9


interests asserted by the parties. In


response to such requests, the court shall


order that the recording be made available


for public inspection and copying with no


redaction of the portions that were


temporarily withheld by reliance on this


division or order an extension of time


during which the recording may be withheld


under the provisions of this division.


Provided further, each such time extension


shall only be ordered by the court for an


additional six-month period of time or less


and cumulative time extensions shall not add


up to more than eighteen (18) months, or


(b) in the event that one hundred twenty (120)


days expire from the date of the events


depicted in the recording without any person


being criminally charged in the case in


question and release of a recording or


portions of a recording have been denied on


the grounds provided for in this division,


an appeal of such denial may be made to the


appropriate district court. In situations


where one hundred twenty (120) days have

Req. No. 346 Page 10


expired since the creation of the recording,


criminal charges have not been filed against


a person and the recording is being withheld


on the grounds provided for in this


division, courts considering appeals to the


use of the provisions of this division for


temporarily withholding a recording shall


conduct a hearing and consider whether the


interests of the public outweigh the


interests of the parties protected by this


division. In response to such appeals, the


district court shall order that the


recording be made available for public


inspection and copying with no redaction of


the portions that were temporarily withheld


by reliance on this division or order an


extension of time during which the recording


may be withheld under the provisions of this


division. An order granting an extension of


time shall be applicable to the recording


against all appellants for the duration of


the extension. Provided, each such time


extension shall only be ordered by the


district court for an additional twelve-

Req. No. 346 Page 11


month period of time or less and cumulative


time extensions shall not add up to more


than three (3) years. Provided, charges


being filed against a person in the case in


question automatically cancels any extension


of time. A new request for an extension of


time following an arraignment or initial


appearance may be requested by the parties


on the grounds and under the terms provided


for in subdivision (a) of this division.


The options presented in this division to


potentially withhold a recording or portions of a


recording on the grounds provided for in this


division shall expire in totality four (4) years


after the recording was made at which time all


recordings previously withheld on the grounds


provided for in this division shall be made


available for public inspection and copying, or


(13) reveal the identity of law enforcement officers


who have become subject to internal investigation


by the law enforcement agency as a result of an


event depicted in the recording. The option to


protect the identity of a law enforcement officer


shall not be available to the law enforcement

Req. No. 346 Page 12


agency after the law enforcement agency has


concluded the investigation and rendered a


decision as to final disciplinary action. At


such time when an investigation has concluded and


the law enforcement agency has rendered its


decision as to final disciplinary action, the


portions of the recordings previously withheld as


provided for in this division shall be available


for public inspection and copying. The audio and


video recordings withheld on the grounds provided


for in this division shall be available for


public inspection and copying before the


conclusion of the investigation if the


investigation lasts for an unreasonable amount of


time.


B. 1. Except for the records listed in subsection A of this


section and those made open by other state or local laws, law


enforcement agencies may deny access to law enforcement records


except where a court finds that the public interest or the interest


of an individual outweighs the reason for denial. The provisions of


this section shall not operate to deny access to law enforcement


records if such records have been previously made available to the


public as provided in the Oklahoma Open Records Act or as otherwise


provided by law.

Req. No. 346 Page 13


2. a. A law enforcement agency shall deny access to any


audio or video recording that depicts the death of a


law enforcement officer who was acting in the course


of his or her official duties including any related


acts or events immediately preceding or subsequent to


the acts or events that caused or otherwise relate to


the death, except where a court finds that the public


interest or the interest of an individual outweighs


the reason for denial. Provided, however, a law


enforcement agency may allow a family member of the


deceased law enforcement officer to hear or view such


audio or video recording under protocols established


by the law enforcement agency. For the purposes of


this subparagraph, “family member” means a spouse,


adult child, parent or sibling of the deceased law


enforcement officer.


b. Nothing in subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be


construed to prohibit the prosecution and defense


counsel from access to such audio or video recordings


or the use of such recordings as evidence in a legal


proceeding.


C. Nothing contained in this section imposes any new


recordkeeping requirements. Law enforcement records shall be kept


for as long as is now or may hereafter be specified by law. Absent

Req. No. 346 Page 14


a legal requirement for the keeping of a law enforcement record for


a specific time period, law enforcement agencies shall maintain


their records for so long as needed for administrative purposes.


D. Registration files maintained by the Department of


Corrections pursuant to the provisions of the Sex Offenders


Registration Act shall be made available for public inspection in a


manner to be determined by the Department.


E. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training


(C.L.E.E.T.) shall keep confidential all records it maintains


pursuant to Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes and


deny release of records relating to any employed or certified full-


time officer, reserve officer, retired officer or other person;


teacher lesson plans, tests and other teaching materials; and


personal communications concerning individual students except under


the following circumstances:


1. To verify the current certification status of any peace


officer;


2. As may be required to perform the duties imposed by Section


3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. To provide to any peace officer copies of the records of


that peace officer upon submitting a written request;


4. To provide, upon written request, to any law enforcement


agency conducting an official investigation, copies of the records


of any peace officer who is the subject of such investigation;

Req. No. 346 Page 15


5. To provide final orders of administrative proceedings where


an adverse action was taken against a peace officer; and


6. Pursuant to an order of the district court of the State of


Oklahoma.


F. The Department of Public Safety shall keep confidential:


1. All records it maintains pursuant to its authority under


Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes relating to the Oklahoma Highway


Patrol Division, the Communications Division, and other divisions of


the Department relating to:


a. training, lesson plans, teaching materials, tests and


test results,


b. policies, procedures and operations, any of which are


of a tactical nature, and


c. the following information from radio logs:


(1) telephone numbers,


(2) addresses other than the location of incidents to


which officers are dispatched, and


(3) personal information which is contrary to the


provisions of the Driver’s Privacy Protection


Act, 18 United States Code, Sections 2721 through


2725; and


2. For the purpose of preventing identity theft and invasion of


law enforcement computer systems, except as provided in Title 47 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, all driving records.

Req. No. 346 Page 16


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-506, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-506. A. Any peace officer of this state shall seize


the following property:


1. Any property described in subsection A of Section 2-503 of


this title. Such property shall be held as evidence until a


forfeiture has been declared or release ordered, except for property


described in paragraphs 1, 2 and 3 of subsection A of Section 2-503


of this title, or in the case of money, coins, and currency,


deposited as provided in subsection E of Section 2-503 of this


title; provided, any money, coins and currency taken or detained


pursuant to this section may be deposited in an interest-bearing


account by or at the direction of the district attorney in the


office of the county treasurer if the district attorney determines


the currency is not to be held as evidence. All interest earned on


such monies shall be returned to the claimant or forfeited with the


money, coins and currency which was taken or detained as provided by


law;


2. Any property described in subsection B of Section 2-503 of


this title; or


3. Any property described in subsection C of Section 2-503 of


this title.


B. Notice of seizure and intended forfeiture proceeding shall


be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court for the

Req. No. 346 Page 17


county wherein such property is seized and shall be given all owners


and parties in interest. Notwithstanding any other provision of


law, no filing fees shall be assessed by the court clerk for the


filing of any forfeiture action.


C. Notice shall be given by the agency seeking forfeiture


according to one of the following methods:


1. Upon each owner or party in interest whose right, title or


interest is of record in the Tax Commission, by mailing a copy of


the notice by certified mail to the address as given upon the


records of the Tax Commission;


2. Upon each owner or party in interest whose name and address


is known to the attorney in the office of the agency prosecuting the


action to recover unpaid fines, by mailing a copy of the notice by


registered mail to the last-known address; or


3. Upon all other owners or interested parties, whose addresses


are unknown, but who are believed to have an interest in the


property, by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation


in the county where the seizure was made.


D. Within forty-five (45) days after the mailing or publication


of the notice, the owner of the property and any other party in


interest or claimant may file a verified answer and claim to the


property described in the notice of seizure and of the intended


forfeiture proceeding.



Req. No. 346 Page 18


E. If at the end of forty-five (45) days after the notice has


been mailed or published there is no verified answer on file, the


court shall hear evidence upon the fact of the unlawful use and


shall order the property forfeited to the state, if such fact is


proved. Except as otherwise provided for in Section 2-503 of this


title, any such property shall be forfeited to the state and sold


under judgment of the court pursuant to the provisions of Section 2-


508 of this title.


F. If a verified answer is filed, the forfeiture proceeding


shall be set for hearing.


G. At a hearing in a proceeding against property described in


paragraphs 3 through 9 of subsection A or subsections B and C of


Section 2-503 of this title, the requirements set forth in said the


paragraph or subsection, respectively, shall be satisfied by the


state by a preponderance of the evidence.


H. The claimant of any right, title, or interest in the


property may prove a lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract


to be a bona fide or innocent ownership interest and that such


right, title, or interest was created without any knowledge or


reason to believe that the property was being, or was to be, used


for the purpose charged.


I. In the event of such proof, the court shall order the


property released to the bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder,


mortgagee or vendor if the amount due him is equal to, or in excess

Req. No. 346 Page 19


of, the value of the property as of the date of the seizure, it


being the intention of this section to forfeit only the right, title


or interest of the purchaser.


J. If the amount due to such person is less than the value of


the property, or if no bona fide claim is established, the property


shall be forfeited to the state and sold under judgment of the


court, as provided for in Section 2-508 of this title, except as


otherwise provided for in Section 2-503 of this title.


K. Property taken or detained under this section shall not be


repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the office


of the district attorney of the county wherein the property was


seized, subject only to the orders and decrees of the court or the


official having jurisdiction thereof; said the official shall


maintain a true and accurate inventory and record of all such


property seized under the provisions of this section. The


provisions of this subsection shall not apply to property taken or


detained by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous


Drugs Control, the Department of Public Safety, the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation, the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement


Commission, the Department of Corrections or the Office of the


Attorney General. Property taken or detained by the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, the Department of


Public Safety, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, the


Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission, the Department of

Req. No. 346 Page 20


Corrections or the Office of the Attorney General shall be subject


to the provisions of subsections E and F of Section 2-503 of this


title.


L. The proceeds of the sale of any property not taken or


detained by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous


Drugs Control, the Department of Public Safety, the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation, the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement


Commission, the Department of Corrections or the Office of the


Attorney General shall be distributed as follows, in the order


indicated:


1. To the bona fide or innocent purchaser, conditional sales


vendor or mortgagee of the property, if any, up to the amount of his


or her interest in the property, when the court declaring the


forfeiture orders a distribution to such person;


2. To the payment of the actual expenses of preserving the


property and legitimate costs related to the civil forfeiture


proceedings. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “legitimate


costs” shall not include court costs associated with any civil


forfeiture proceeding; and


3. The balance to a revolving fund in the office of the county


treasurer of the county wherein the property was seized, said the


fund to be used as a revolving fund solely for enforcement of


controlled dangerous substances laws, drug abuse prevention and drug


abuse education, and maintained by the district attorney in his or

Req. No. 346 Page 21


her discretion for those purposes with a yearly accounting to the


board of county commissioners in whose county the fund is


established and to the District Attorneys Council; provided, one


hundred percent (100%) of the balance of the proceeds of such sale


of property forfeited due to nonpayment of a fine imposed pursuant


to the provisions of Section 2-415 of this title shall be


apportioned as provided in Section 2-416 of this title. The


revolving fund shall be audited by the State Auditor and Inspector


at least every two (2) years in the manner provided in Section 171


of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Said The audit shall include,


but not be limited to, a compliance audit. A district attorney may


enter into agreements with municipal, tribal, county or state


agencies to return to such an agency a percentage of proceeds of the


sale of any property seized by the agency and forfeited under the


provisions of this section. The District Attorneys Council shall


adopt guidelines which ensure that such agencies receive a


reasonable percentage of such proceeds, considering the relative


contribution of each agency to the drug enforcement and prosecution


operations relating to the seizure. In formulating said the


guidelines, the District Attorneys Council shall examine federal


guidelines on asset distribution and use said the guidelines as a


basis for establishing guidelines for this state. The Attorney


General is hereby authorized to mediate disputes between district


attorneys and such agencies concerning the application of said the

Req. No. 346 Page 22


guidelines in particular instances. Any agency that receives


proceeds from an asset distribution shall maintain a true and


accurate record of all such assets.


M. Whenever any vehicle, airplane or vessel is forfeited under


the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, the district court


of jurisdiction may order that the vehicle, airplane or vessel


seized may be retained by the state, county or city law enforcement


agency which seized the vehicle, airplane or vessel for its official


use.


N. If the court finds that the state failed to satisfy the


required showing provided for in subsection G of this section, the


court shall order the property released to the owner or owners.


O. Except as provided for in subsection Q of this section, a


bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder, mortgagee or vendor that


recovers property pursuant to this section shall not be liable for


storage fees.


P. Except as provided for in subsection Q of this section,


storage fees shall be paid by the agency which is processing the


seizure and forfeiture from funds generated by seizure and


forfeiture actions.


Q. The bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder, mortgagee or


vendor shall reclaim subject seized property within thirty (30) days


of written notice from the seizing agency. If such person fails to



Req. No. 346 Page 23


reclaim the property within the thirty-day time period, then storage


fees may be assessed against their secured interest.


R. 1. At any hearing held relevant to this section, a report


of the findings of the laboratory of the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation, the medical examiner’s report of investigation or


autopsy report, or a laboratory report from a forensic laboratory


operated by the State of Oklahoma or any political subdivision


thereof, which has been made available to the accused by the office


of the district attorney or other party to the forfeiture at least


five (5) days prior to the hearing, with reference to all or part of


the evidence submitted, when certified as correct by the persons


making the report shall be received as evidence of the facts and


findings stated, if relevant and otherwise admissible in evidence.


If such report is deemed relevant by the forfeiture applicant or the


respondent, the court shall admit such report without the testimony


of the person making the report, unless the court, pursuant to this


subsection, orders such person to appear.


2. When any alleged controlled dangerous substance has been


submitted to the laboratory of the OSBI for analysis, and such


analysis shows that the submitted material is a controlled dangerous


substance, the distribution of which constitutes a felony under the


laws of this state, no portion of such substance shall be released


to any other person or laboratory except to the criminal justice


agency originally submitting the substance to the OSBI for analysis,

Req. No. 346 Page 24


absent an order of a district court. The defendant shall


additionally be required to submit to the court a procedure for


transfer and analysis of the subject material to ensure the


integrity of the sample and to prevent the material from being used


in any illegal manner.


3. The court, upon motion of either party, shall order the


attendance of any person preparing a report submitted as evidence in


the hearing when it appears there is a substantial likelihood that


material evidence not contained in said the report may be produced


by the testimony of any person having prepared a report. The


hearing shall be held and, if sustained, an order issued not less


than five (5) days prior to the time when the testimony shall be


required.


4. If within five (5) days prior to the hearing or during a


hearing, a motion is made pursuant to this section requiring a


person having prepared a report to testify, the court may hear a


report or other evidence but shall continue the hearing until such


time notice of the motion and hearing is given to the person making


the report, the motion is heard, and, if sustained, the testimony


ordered can be given.


S. In any forfeiture proceeding under this chapter in which the


defendant or claimant prevails, the court may order the plaintiff


processing the seizure and forfeiture to pay from funds generated by


seizure and forfeiture actions:

Req. No. 346 Page 25


1. Reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs


reasonably incurred by the defendant or claimant directly related to


the claim on which the defendant or claimant prevailed;


2. Postjudgment interest; and


3. In cases involving currency or other negotiable instruments:


a. interest actually paid to the state from the date of


seizure or arrest of the property that resulted from


the investment of the property in an interest-bearing


account or instrument, and


b. an imputed amount of interest that such currency,


instruments, or proceeds would have earned at the rate


applicable to the thirty-day Treasury Bill, for any


period during which no interest was paid, not


including any period when the property reasonably was


in use as evidence in an official proceeding or in


conducting scientific tests for the purpose of


collecting evidence, commencing fifteen (15) days


after the property was seized by a law enforcement


agency or was turned over to a law enforcement agency


by a federal law enforcement authority.


T. Any law enforcement agency seizing property pursuant to this


section shall electronically submit an annual report by February 1


of each year identifying the property seized and the disposition of


such property to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the

Req. No. 346 Page 26


Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Office


of the State Auditor and Inspector. All reports and data submitted


pursuant to this subsection shall be published on the data.ok.gov


website.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-346 TEK 1/19/2025 5:39:36 AM



































Req. No. 346 Page 27